Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-102.01
Cities of the metropolitan class; ordinances, bylaws, rules, regulations, and resolutions; powers.

A city of the metropolitan class may enact any ordinances, bylaws, rules, regulations, and resolutions not inconsistent with the general laws of the state, as may be necessary or expedient, in addition to specific powers otherwise granted by law, for maintaining the peace, good government, and welfare of the city and for preserving order, securing persons or property from violence, danger, and destruction, for protecting public and private property, and for promoting the public health, safety, convenience, comfort, general interests, and welfare of the inhabitants of the city.

Laws 1967, c. 40, § 2, p. 171;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 10.
July 21, 2022
Under this section the city of Omaha is given power by the State of Nebraska to enact ordinances relating to the safety and security of its citizens and to impose fines, forfeitures, penalties, and imprisonment for violation thereof. State v. Belitz, 203 Neb. 375, 278 N.W.2d 769 (1979).

The Legislature has impliedly empowered the city of Omaha to obtain a decree in equity abating a public nuisance without proving special damage to city. City of Omaha v. Danner, 186 Neb. 701, 185 N.W.2d 869 (1971).